Nevada, session 83, AB218-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 118A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 3.5 of this
act.
Sec. 2. 1. A landlord or his or her agent shall provide a
tenant at least one method of paying rent or any other fee or
charge which does not require the tenant to:
(a) Pay any fee or charge for using the method; or
(b) Provide information concerning a bank account of the
tenant.
2. If a landlord or his or her agent allows a tenant to pay rent
or any other fee or charge through an Internet website or online
portal:
(a) The landlord or his or her agent shall not charge the
tenant a fee to make a payment through the Internet website or
online portal in an amount that exceeds the amount of any fee
charged for the use of the Internet website or online portal by the
operator of the Internet website or online portal; and
(b) The amount of any fee charged to the tenant by the
landlord or his or her agent for the use of the Internet website or
-
*AB218_R2*

– 3 –
online portal must be separately identified in any written rental
agreement.
Sec. 3. 1. A tenant who is aggrieved by a violation of
subsection 6 or 7 of NRS 118A.200 may bring a civil action in any
court of competent jurisdiction for such violation.
2. If a tenant prevails in an action brought pursuant to
subsection 1, the court shall award the tenant:
(a) Any damages the tenant has sustained;
(b) Any equitable relief that the court deems appropriate;
(c) The tenant’s costs in the action and reasonable attorney’s
fees;
(d) Statutory damages of $1,000 for each violation which
involved deception; and
(e) Treble the amount of actual damages sustained by the
tenant as a result of each willful violation.
Sec. 3.5. A landlord or his or her agent shall, upon request,
provide to a prospective tenant a copy of the written rental
agreement, if any, to which the tenant would be subject if he or
she were to become a tenant.
Sec. 4. NRS 118A.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118A.200 1. Any written agreement for the use and
occupancy of a dwelling unit or premises must be signed by the
landlord or his or her agent and the tenant or his or her agent.
2. The landlord shall provide one copy of any written
agreement described in subsection 1 to the tenant free of cost at the
time the agreement is executed and, upon request of the tenant,
provide additional copies of any such agreement to the tenant within
a reasonable time. The landlord may charge a reasonable fee for
providing the additional copies.
3. Any written rental agreement must contain, but is not limited
to, provisions relating to the following subjects:
(a) Duration of the agreement.
(b) Amount of rent , set forth in the manner required by
subsection 6, and the manner and time of its payment.
(c) Occupancy by children or pets.
(d) Services included with the dwelling rental.
(e) Fees which are required and the purposes for which they are
required.
(f) Deposits which are required and the conditions for their
refund.
(g) Charges which may be required for late or partial payment of
rent or for return of any dishonored check.
(h) Inspection rights of the landlord.
(i) A listing of persons or numbers of persons who are to occupy
the dwelling.
-
*AB218_R2*

– 4 –
(j) Respective responsibilities of the landlord and the tenant as
to the payment of utility charges.
(k) A signed record of the inventory and condition of the
premises under the exclusive custody and control of the tenant.
(l) A summary of the provisions of NRS 202.470.
(m) Information regarding the procedure pursuant to which a
tenant may report to the appropriate authorities:
(1) A nuisance.
(2) A violation of a building, safety or health code or
regulation.
(n) Information regarding the right of the tenant to engage in the
display of the flag of the United States, as set forth in
NRS 118A.325.
4. In addition to the provisions required by subsection 3, any
written rental agreement for a single-family residence which is not
signed by an authorized agent of the landlord who at the time of
signing holds a permit to engage in property management pursuant
to chapter 645 of NRS must contain a disclosure at the top of the
first page of the agreement, in a font size at least two times larger
than any other font size in the agreement, which states that:
(a) There are rebuttable presumptions in NRS 205.0813 and
205.0817 that the tenant does not have lawful occupancy of the
dwelling unless the agreement:
(1) Is notarized or is signed by an authorized agent of the
landlord who at the time of signing holds a permit to engage in
property management pursuant to chapter 645 of NRS; and
(2) Includes the current address and telephone number of the
landlord or his or her authorized representative; and
(b) The agreement is valid and enforceable against the landlord
and the tenant regardless of whether the agreement:
(1) Is notarized or is signed by an authorized agent of the
landlord who at the time of signing holds a permit to engage in
property management pursuant to chapter 645 of NRS; or
(2) Includes the current address and telephone number of the
landlord or his or her authorized representative.
5. The absence of a written agreement raises a disputable
presumption that:
(a) There are no restrictions on occupancy by children or pets.
(b) Maintenance and waste removal services are provided
without charge to the tenant.
(c) No charges for partial or late payments of rent or for
dishonored checks are paid by the tenant.
(d) Other than normal wear, the premises will be returned in the
same condition as when the tenancy began.
-
*AB218_R2*

– 5 –
6. In each place where a landlord lists the amount of rent due
under a rental agreement and in any reference in a written rental
agreement to the amount of rent due under the agreement, the
rent must be set forth as a single figure representing the total
amount of periodic rent that includes the amount of any fixed,
mandatory fees to be charged to the tenant in addition to the base
rent.
7. A landlord shall not charge a tenant an amount for
periodic rent that exceeds the amount of rent due under a written
rental agreement as set forth in the manner required by
subsection 6.
8. It is unlawful for a landlord or any person authorized to
enter into a rental agreement on his or her behalf to use any written
agreement which does not conform to the provisions of this section,
and any provision in an agreement which contravenes the provisions
of this section is void.
[7.] 9. As used in this section, “single-family residence”
means a structure that is comprised of not more than four units. The
term does not include a manufactured home as defined in
NRS 118B.015.
H
-
*AB218_R2*